Louisiana, session 2026, HB695.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:1713(9) and (10) and 1715.1 are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§1713. Definitions
For the purposes of this Chapter, the following terms shall have the following
meaning:
* * *
(9) "Consensual noncommercial towing" means the noncommercial
movement or transportation of a vehicle by another vehicle with the prior consent or
authorization of the owner or operator of the vehicle.
(10) "Noncommercial towing" means the movement or transportation of
personal property for private, nonbusiness, or recreational purposes.
* * *
§1715.1. Consensual noncommercial towing of motor vehicles; requirements
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-605 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 695
A.(1) Consensual noncommercial towing shall be unlawful on the highways
and roadways of the state of Louisiana unless the owner of the vehicle obtains a
permit issued by the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles. The department shall require, at a minimum, that the vehicle engaged in the
act of towing complies with the following:
(a) Use of hazard lights while in tow.
(b) Use of reflectors while in tow.
(c) Use of signage indicating towing is in progress.
(d) Use of proper equipment to safely tow the vehicle.
(2) The owner of the vehicle engaged in the consensual noncommercial tow
shall ensure that the department issued permit is attached to any vehicle while in tow
and is clearly visible.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any violation
of this Section shall result in a fine of one thousand dollars and be payable to the
Louisiana State Police.
C. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of motor
vehicles, shall promulgate rules and regulations as are necessary for the
implementation of this Section.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
arrange in alphabetical order and renumber the definitions provided in R.S. 32:1713.